Washington statutes.
RCW 6.27.095

Garnishee's processing fees.

(1) The garnishee of a writ for a continuing lien on earnings may deduct a processing fee from the remainder of the obligor's earnings after withholding the required amount under the writ. The processing fee may not exceed twenty dollars for the first answer and ten dollars at the time the garnishee submits the second answer.

(2) If the writ of garnishment is not a writ for a continuing lien on earnings, the garnishee is entitled to check or money order payable to the garnishee in the amount of twenty dollars at the time the writ of garnishment is served on the garnishee as required under RCW 6.27.110(1).

[ 1998 c 227 s 2; 1997 c 296 s 3.]